Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.270

Application of administrative procedure act to acts of the director.

The director, in implementing and administering the provisions of this chapter, shall act in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1991 c 328 s 27.]